Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1204
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-1204.01 to 38-1214 apply.

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 4;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-5175;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 602;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 488;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 9;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 14.